Utah statutes.
58-31b-304.   Qualifications for admission to the examinations.

(1)  To be admitted to the examinations required for certification as a medication aide certified, a person shall:

(a)  submit an application on a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee as determined by the division under Section 63J-1-504; and

(c)  meet all requirements of Subsection 58-31b-302(1), except the passing of the examination.

(2)  To be admitted to the examinations required for licensure as a practical nurse, a person shall:

(a)  submit an application form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee as determined by the division under Section 63J-1-504; and

(c)  meet all requirements of Subsection 58-31b-302(2), except Subsection (2)(f).

(3)  To be admitted to the examinations required for licensure as a registered nurse, a person shall:

(a)  submit an application form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee as determined by the division under Section 63J-1-504; and

(c)  meet all the requirements of Subsection 58-31b-302(3), except Subsection (3)(f).



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

